Wisconsin, session 2025, SB503.
do enact as follows:SB503,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB503,26Section 2. 20.455 (2) (de) of the statutes is created to read:SB503,2,9720.455 (2) (de) Safe firearm disposal incentive grant program. As a 8continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule to provide grants to counties 9or law enforcement agencies under s. 165.985.SB503,310Section 3. 165.985 of the statutes is created to read:SB503,2,1411165.985 Safe firearm disposal incentive grant program. (1) The 12department of justice shall award grants from the appropriation account under s. 1320.455 (2) (de) to counties or law enforcement agencies that implement a safe 14firearm disposal incentive program in their jurisdictions.SB503,2,1615(2) A county or law enforcement agency is eligible for a grant under this 16section if the county or agency does all of the following:SB503,2,1817(a) Proposes and administers a plan to advertise the safe firearm disposal 18incentive program.SB503,2,2119(b) Proposes and administers a plan that has law enforcement personnel 20administering the program. The plan may use grant funds to pay law enforcement 21personnel for any overtime hours spent administering the program.SB503,3,222(c) Keeps any firearms received in the possession of the county or law 23enforcement agency until the firearm is destroyed or, if working with the state 1historical society regarding a historical firearm, is transferred to the state 2historical society for preservation.SB503,3,53(d) Establishes and follows safeguards to prevent fraud in the program and to 4prevent solicitation or other sales of firearms on the premises, including a parking 5lot.SB503,3,86(e) Establishes and follows a process for utilizing a firearms dealer, as defined 7in s. 175.35 (1) (ar), to inspect on-site a firearm received before providing payment 8to an individual for the firearm.SB503,3,119(f) If the county or law enforcement agency provides payment for the firearm 10in the form of a gift card or certificate, ensures the gift card or certificate cannot be 11redeemed for a firearm or ammunition.SB503,3,1412(3) (a) A county or law enforcement agency applying to the department of 13justice for a grant under this section shall include a proposed plan that complies 14with the requirements under sub. (2).SB503,3,1715(b) A grant recipient under this section shall submit a report to the 16department of justice within 90 days of the conclusion of the safe firearm disposal 17incentive program that includes all of the following:SB503,3,19181. The make, model, color, serial number, and total number of firearms 19received and destroyed through the program.SB503,3,21202. Any recommendations for improving safe firearm disposal incentive 21programs.SB503,4,222(4) Grants awarded under this section may not supplant any other funds that 1the grant recipient uses for safe firearm disposal incentive programs at the time the 2grant is awarded.SB503,4,53(5) By July 1, 2028, the department of justice shall submit a report to the 4chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to the legislature under s. 513.172 (2) that provides all of the following information:SB503,4,76(a) The number of counties and law enforcement agencies that received a 7grant under this section.SB503,4,108(b) The number of firearms received through each safe firearm disposal 9incentive program and the total number of firearms received through all safe 10firearm disposal incentive programs.SB503,4,1211(c) Recommendations on improving safe firearm disposal incentive programs 12and the administration of grants under this section.SB503,4,1913(6) An individual who is submitting a firearm to a grant recipient under this 14section is immune from prosecution for a violation under s. 941.29 if the individual 15is on the specific property owned, leased, or used for the program, except that, if the 16individual commits a crime while on the specific property, the individual may be 17prosecuted for a violation under s. 941.29. Submission of a firearm to a grant 18recipient under this section may not be used to establish probable cause for a 19violation of s. 941.29.SB503,420Section 4. Fiscal changes.SB503,5,521(1) Grant administration. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 22appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (2) (a), the dollar amount 23for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $85,000 to increase the authorized FTE 1positions by 0.75 GPR position for a grant specialist and policy program analyst for 2the program under s. 165.985. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 3appropriation to the department of justice under s. 20.455 (2) (a), the dollar amount 4for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $85,000 to provide funding for the position 5authorized under this subsection.SB503,5,66